Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 2501.
Policy and purpose.

In order to safeguard property and the public welfare, the practice of land surveying in this State is declared to be subject to regulation in the public interest in accordance with the terms of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 364

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1969; amended

1981, No. 79

, §§ 1, 2, eff. May 5, 1981;

1985, No. 245

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 2502.
Definitions.

For the purpose of this chapter:

“Board” means the Board of Land Surveyors established under this chapter.

“Disciplinary action” includes any action taken against a licensee for unprofessional conduct.

“Licensed land surveyor” means a person licensed by the Board who is:

a professional specialist in measuring land;

educated in the principles of mathematics, the related physical and applied sciences, and real property law; and

engaged in the practice of land surveying as defined in this section.

“Practice of land surveying” means providing, or offering to provide, professional services, including record research, reconnaissance, measurements, gathering parol evidence, analysis of evidence, mapping, planning, expert testimony, and consultation related to any of the following:

locating, relocating, establishing, reestablishing, or retracing property lines or boundaries, or demarcating other legal rights or interests in any tract of land, road, right-of-way, or easement;

determining, by the use of principles of surveying, the position for any boundary monument or reference point, or replacing any monument or reference point;

making any survey for the division, subdivision, or consolidation of any tract of land;

creating, preparing, or modifying graphic documents such as maps, plats, and plans, or electronic data used or referenced in instruments of conveyance of rights in real property, or that define rights in real property, or are used to define such rights;

calculating dimensions and areas, which may be used to define rights in real property.

“Monument” excludes paint marks, ribbons, signs, and any nonpermanent structures supporting ribbons or signs.

“Responsible charge” means direct control and personal supervision.

“Supervision” of an applicant means regular personal review of the applicant’s land surveying work.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 364

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1969; amended

1985, No. 245

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2003, No. 60

, § 13.

§ 2503.
Prohibition; exceptions.

A person who is not licensed by the Board shall not:

use the title “licensed land surveyor” or any substantially equivalent title;

represent himself or herself as licensed by this State or able to perform land surveying; or

practice land surveying or act in responsible charge of another person who practices land surveying.

Subdivision (a)(3) of this section does not prohibit preparation of assessment maps, current use maps for use valuation appraisal, or similar maps, which are clearly not intended to indicate the legally authoritative location or demarcation of property boundaries or extent where legal rights or interests in any tract of land are or may be affected, or licensed or qualified members of other professions or trades from performing duties incidental to those occupations.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 364

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1969; amended

1985, No. 245

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2003, No. 60

, § 14.

§ 2504.
Penalties and enforcement.

A person who violates subsection 2503(a) of this chapter shall be subject to the penalties provided in

3 V.S.A. § 127(c)

.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 364

(Adj. Sess.), § 21, eff. Jan. 1, 1969; amended

1985, No. 245

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2007, No. 29

, § 36;

2007, No. 163

(Adj. Sess.), § 28.